Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.210

Allowance of claims, expenses, partial fees—Sale of property—Decree of distribution.

If at the expiration of four months from the date of the first publication of notice to creditors no heirs have appeared and established their claim to the estate, the court may enter an interim order allowing claims, expenses, and partial fees. If at the expiration of ten months from the date of issuance of letters testamentary or of administration no heirs have appeared and established their claim to the estate, all personal property not in the form of cash shall be sold under order of the court. Personal property found by the court to be worthless shall be ordered abandoned. Real property shall not be sold for the satisfaction of liens thereon, or for the payment of the debts of decedent or expenses of administration until the proceeds of the personal property are first exhausted. The court shall then enter a decree allowing any additional fees and charges deemed proper and distributing the balance of the cash on hand, together with any real property, to the state. Remittance of cash on hand shall be made to the department of revenue which shall make proper records thereof and forthwith forward such funds to the state treasurer for deposit in the permanent common school fund of the state.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 209 s 19; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 5; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.210. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Applicability—1979 ex.s. c 209: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions; shall take effect immediately; and shall be effective with respect to persons dying after the effective date of this act." [ 1979 ex.s. c 209 s 52.] The effective date of 1979 ex.s. c 209 was May 29, 1979.

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.